South Dakota, session 2026, SB225.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That § 13-13-1 be AMENDED:
13-13-1. The commissioner of school and public lands, after any adjustments that
have been made pursuant to § 5-10-18.3, shall apportion the school funds as follows:the:
(1) The commissioner shall ascertain from the division of education the total number
of resident pupils students in average daily membership, as defined in § 13-13-
1.1, in each school district and the total number of pupils students in average daily
membership in all school districts, and on that basis of the school population, the;
and
(2) The commissioner shall apportion to each school district, pro rata, such share, as
its population of resident pupils students in average daily membership in the school
district bears to the total number of pupils students in average daily membership
in all school districts.
The funds to be apportioned include funds derived from the lease of school lands, the
lease of public lands not apportioned to any educational, penal, or charitable institution,
the interest, dividends, and other income on invested funds derived from the sale of school
lands and public lands not apportioned to any such institution of these institutions, and
the interest, dividends, and other income on invested funds derived from the five percent
paid by the United States on the sale of public lands within the state, and the distribution
amount from the unclaimed property trust fund, pursuant to § 43-41B-24.5.
Section 2. That § 43-41B-24.4 be AMENDED:
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.852.9 2 225
43-41B-24.4. There is created in the state treasury the trust fund for unclaimed
property. The fund consists of any net receipts from unclaimed property that exceed the
maximum deposit requirements of § 43-41B-24.3.
The state treasurer shall administer the fund. The purpose of the fund is to provide
for the return of unclaimed property, provide for the payment of audit expenses, and
deposit into the general fund the distribution amount, in accordance with § 43-41B-24.5.
Distribution amounts from the fund must be budgeted through the general appropriation
bill, as provided for in § 43-41B-24.5, or expended by special appropriation. Moneys
comprising the principal amount in the trust fund for unclaimed property may not be
appropriated by the general appropriation bill or by special appropriation.
Section 3. That § 43-41B-24.5 be AMENDED:
43-41B-24.5. Beginning in fiscal year 2026 and each fiscal year thereafter, the
state treasurer shall, after paying from the unclaimed property operating fund all claims
and any administrative costs associated with the sale of unclaimed property, deposit into
the general fund the net receipts from unclaimed property, up to the general fund
contribution limit, as established in § 43-41B-24.3.
Any net receipts from unclaimed property that exceed the general fund contribution
limit as defined in § 43-41B-24.3, must be deposited into the trust fund for unclaimed
property.
The state investment officer shall calculate an amount equal to four percent of the
market value of the trust fund for unclaimed property, without invading principal, as
eligible for distribution to the general fund commissioner of school and public lands for
apportionment pursuant to § 13-13-1. Until fiscal year 2031, the distribution must be
based on the market value as of each December thirty-first, beginning with the market
value as of December 31, 2025. Beginning with the distribution in fiscal year 2031, the
market value must be determined by adding the market value of the trust fund at the end
of the sixteen most recent calendar quarters as of December thirty-first, and dividing the
sum by sixteen. Upon notice of the amount by the state investment officer, the state
treasurer shall transfer the distribution amount from the trust fund to the general fund
commissioner of school and public lands, as soon as practicable after July first of the next
fiscal year.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.